en: whole wheat flour, wholewheat flour, wholemeal wheat flour, atta
bg: пълнозърнесто пшенично брашно, брашно пшенично пълнозърнесто
ca: farina integral de blat, farina de blat integral
cs: celozrnná pšeničná mouka, celozrnna pšenična mouka
da: hvedefuldkornsmel, fuldkornshvedemel
de: Vollkornweizenmehl, Weizenvollkornmehl
es: harina de trigo integral, harina integral de trigo
et: täistera nisujahu, täisteranisujahu
fi: täysjyvävehnäjauho
fr: farine de blé complète, farine de blé complet, farine complète de blé, farine intégrale de blé, farine complète de froment
hr: integralno pšenično brašno, pšenično brašno od cjelovitog zrna, pšenično brašno iz cijelog zrna, brašno cijelog zrna pšenice, brašno od cjelovitog zrna pšenice, cjelovito pšenično brašno, integralno i namjensko pšenično brašno, brašno pšenično integralno iz cijelog zrna
hu: teljes kiőrlésű búzaliszt
it: farina integrale di frumento, farina di frumento integrale
ja: 小麦全粒粉
lt: visų grūdo dalių kviečių miltai, visų grūdo dalių kvietiniai miltai, visų grūdo dalių kvietinės miltai, visų grūdo dalių kvietinis miltai
lv: pilngraudu kviešu milti, rupja maluma cleto kviešu milti
nb: fullkornshvetemel
nl: volkorentarwemeel, volkoren tarwemeel
pl: Mąka pszenna pełnoziarnista, mąka pszenna razowa, pełnoziarnista mąka pszenna, mąka pełnoziarnista pszenna
pt: farinha de trigo integral, farinha integral de trigo
ro: făină integrală de grâu
sk: celozrnna pšenična muka
sv: fullkornsvetemjöl, fullkornsmjöl av vete

en: semi-wholemeal wheat flour
fr: farine de blé semi-complète, farine de blé semi-complète, farine de blé semi-complet, farine semi-complète de blé, farine semi-complète de froment, farine de froment semi-complet
hr: pšenično poluintegralno brašno
it: farina di frumento semi-integrale, farina semi-integrale di frumento

en: dextrinated wheat flour
de: dextriniertes Weizenmehl
es: harina de trigo dextrinada
fr: farine de blé dextrinée
hr: dekstrinirano pšenično brašno
hu: dextrinált búzaliszt
it: farina di grano tenero destrinata
nl: gedextrineerd tarwemeel

en: pre-gelatinized wheat flour
de: Weizenquellmehl
fr: farine de blé prégélatinisée, farine de froment prégélatinisée
hr: prethodno želatinizirano pšenično brašno

en: fortified wheat flour, enriched wheat flour
cs: Obohacená pšeničná mouka, obohacená pšeničná mouka
de: angereichertes Weizenmehl
es: Harina de trigo fortificada
fi: rikastettu vehnäjauho, vitaminoitu vehnäjauho
fr: farine de blé enrichie
hr: pšenično bubreno brašno
it: farina di frumento fortificata
nl: verrijkt tarwebloem
pl: Wzbogacona mąka pszenna
sv: berikat vetemjöl

en: fortified british wheat flour
de: angereichertes britisches Weizenmehl
hr: obogaćeno britansko pšenično brašno
it: farina di grano britannico fortificata

en: soft wheat flour, tender wheat flour
de: Weichweizenmehl
fi: hieno vehnäjauho
fr: farine de blé tendre, farine de blés tendres
hr: meko pšenično brašno
it: farina di grano tenero
pl: mąka z pszenicy miękkiej, mąka z miękkiej pszenicy
ro: făină de grâu moale

en: soft whole wheat flour, wholemeal soft wheat flour
it: farina integrale di grano tenero, farina di grano tenero integrale

en: Wheat flour type 150
fr: Farine de blé tendre T150, farine de blé T150, farine de froment T150
hr: pšenično brašno tip 150
it: farina di grano tenero tipo 150

en: Wheat flour type 110
fr: Farine de blé tendre T110, farine de blé t110, farine de froment T110
hr: pšenično brašno tip 110
it: farina di grano tenero tipo 110

bg: бяло пшенично брашно
de: Weissmehl
fi: valkoinen vehnäjauho
fr: farine blanche
hr: bijelo brašno
hu: fehérliszt
it: farina bianca
ro: făină albă

en: dark wheat flour, yeast bread wheat flour
de: Weizenbrotmehl, dunkles Weizenmehl, Hefebrotweizenmehl, Hefebrotmehl
fi: hiivaleipäjauho, tumma vehnäjauho, hiivaleipävehnäjauho, vehnähiivaleipäjauho
hr: tamno pšenično brašno
sv: jästbrödsvetemjöl, vetejästbrödmjöl

en: wheat flour preparation
hr: pripravak pšenično brašno, pripravak pšenično brašno 1850
it: preparato a base di farina

en: barley flour
bg: ечемично брашно
cs: Ječmenná mouka
de: Gerstenmehl
es: harina de cebada
fi: ohrajauho
fr: farine d'orge
hr: ječmeno brašno
hu: árpaliszt
it: farina d'orzo, farina di orzo
nl: gerstemeel
pl: Mąka jęczmienna
pt: farinha de cevada
ro: făină de orz
ru: Ячменная мука
sv: kornmjöl
tr: arpa unu

en: wholemeal barley flour, whole grain barley flour, wholegrain barley flour
bg: пълнозърнесто ечемично брашно, пълнозърнесто ечемичено брашно
cs: celozrnná ječná mouka
de: Gerstenvollkornmehl, Gersten-Vollkornmehl
es: harina de cebada integral, harina integral de cebada
fi: täysjyväohrajauho
fr: farine complète d’orge, farine d'orge complète
hr: integralno ječmeno brašno, ječmeno brašno iz cijelog zrna, brašno cijelog zrna ječma, brašno od cjelovitog zrna ječma, brašno iz cijelog zrna ječma, ječmeno brašno od cjelovitog zrna
hu: teljes kiőrlésű árpaliszt
it: farina integrale d'orzo, farina integrale di orzo
nl: volkoren gerstemeel
pl: mąka jęczmienna pełnoziarnista, pełnoziarnista mąka jęczmienna
sv: fullkornskornmjöl

en: barley malt flour, malted barley flour
ca: farina de malta d'ordi
cs: Ječmenná sladová mouka, ječná sladová mouka
da: bygmaltmel
de: Gerstenmalzmehl
es: harina de malta de cebada
fi: ohramallasjauho
fr: farine de malt d'orge, farine d'orge malté
hr: brašno od ječmenog slado, ječmeno sladno brašno, sladno ječmeno brašno
hu: árpamalátaliszt
it: farina di orzo maltato, farina d'orzo maltato, farina di malto d'orzo
nl: gerstemoutmeel
pl: mąka ze słodu jęczmiennego, mąka jęczmienna słodowa
sv: kornmaltmjöl, maltmjöl av korn

en: dark barley malt flour
fr: farine d'orge malté toasté, farine d'orge maltée torréfiée, farine d'orge malté torréfié
it: farina di orzo maltato tostato, farina d'orzo maltato tostato, farina di malto d'orzo tostato
nl: donkere gerstemoutbloem

en: dextrinated barley flour
de: dextriniertes Gerstenmehl
es: harina de cebada dextrinada
fr: farine d’orge dextrinée
hr: dekstrinirano ječmeno brašno
hu: dextrinált árpaliszt
it: farina d'orzo destrinata
nl: gedextrineerd gerstemeel, gedextrineerd gerstmeel

en: rye flour
bg: ръжено брашно, брашно от ръж, брашно ръжено, ръжено пшенично брашно
ca: farina de blat de sègol, farina de blat de segol, farina de sègol
cs: žitná mouka
da: rugmel
de: Roggenmehl, Roggenmehl Typ 1150
es: harina de centeno
fi: ruisjauho
fr: farine de seigle
he: קמח שיפון
hr: raženo brašno
hu: rozsliszt
it: farina di segale, farina di segala
ja: ライ麦粉
lv: rudzu milti
nb: rugmel
nl: roggemeel, roggebloem, rogge-bloem
pl: mąka żytnia
pt: farinha de centeio
ro: făină de secară, faina de secara
ru: Ржаная мука, мука ржаная
sv: rågmjöl
tr: çavdar unu

en: Rye flour type 170, Rye flour T170
fr: Farine de seigle T170
hr: raženo brašno tip 170
it: farina di segale tipo 170